North Dakota statutes. TITLE 50 Public Welfare
CHAPTER 50-24.1 Medical Assistance for Needy Persons
50-24.1-18.
Personal care option — Residential habilitation — Community support services.

The department shall implement personal care services.

The department may implement residential habilitation and community support services in a residential setting or private residence that would allow for the delegation of administration of medication by an employee of a qualified service provider agency. The qualified service provider agency shall employ or contract with a licensed registered nurse to provide supervision to the employees of a qualified service provider agency who are administering routine medications. The employees of a qualified service provider agency shall complete department-approved training on the administration of routine medications before administering routine medications. The department shall adopt rules as are necessary to establish and govern residential habilitation and community support services in a residential setting or private residence.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 427, § 1; 2019, ch. 405, § 6, effective August 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 408, § 25, effective July 1, 2019.

Note.

Section 50-24.1-18 was amended 2 times by the 2019 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 25 of Chapter 408, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1115; and Section 6 of Chapter 405, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1099.

Section 8 of chapter 405, S.L. 2019 provides,

“CONTINGENT IMPLEMENTATION - APPLICATION.

The department of human services may not implement residential habilitation and community supports in section 6 of this Act unless the sixty-sixth legislative assembly provides an appropriation in Senate Bill No. 2012 to support the implementation of residential habilitation and community supports in section 6 of this Act.”

Section 7 of chapter 405, S.L. 2019 provides, “

IMPLEMENTATION CONTINGENT UPON APPROPRIATION - APPLICATION.

The department of human services is not required to implement or enforce sections 1, 2, 3, 4, and 6 of this Act with respect to agency foster home for adults and administration of routine medication if the legislative assembly does not provide an appropriation to support the implementation and enforcement of sections 1, 2, 3, 4, and 6 of this Act.”

50-24.1-18.1.
Consumer-directed health maintenance services — Residing at home. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 422, § 2; 2005, ch. 426, § 1; 2007, ch. 425, § 1; 2019, ch. 408, § 26, effective July 1, 2019; repealed by 2021, ch. 12, § 35, effective July 1, 2021.

50-24.1-19.
Oral maxillofacial services — Medical necessity. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 428, § 1; repealed by 2019, ch. 408, § 39, effective July 1, 2019.

50-24.1-20.
Home and community-based living — Choice of options.

Any aged or disabled individual who is eligible for home and community-based living must be allowed to choose, from among all service options available, the type of service that best meets that individual’s needs. To the extent permitted by any applicable waiver, the individual’s medical assistance funds must follow the individual for whichever service option the individual selects, not to exceed the cost of the service.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 426, § 1; 2019, ch. 408, § 27, effective July 1, 2019.

50-24.1-21.
Department to submit plans and seek waivers. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 421, § 3.

Effective Date.

The repeal of this section by section 3 of chapter 421, S.L. 2007 became effective March 2, 2007, pursuant to an emergency clause in section 4 of chapter 421, S.L. 2007.

50-24.1-22.
Long-term care facility information. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 431, § 1; repealed by 2019, ch. 408, § 39, effective July 1, 2019.

50-24.1-23.
Long-term care facility resident — Medical assistance eligibility.

An individual is not ineligible for medical assistance if application of disqualifying transfer provisions would deprive the individual of nursing care and services and the individual makes a satisfactory showing that:

For periods after the return, all income or assets constituting the disqualifying transfer have been transferred or assigned back to the individual and the individual is otherwise eligible for medical assistance; or

Compensation equal to the fair market value of the income or asset at time of transfer is paid to, or on behalf of, the individual for nursing care and services provided by a long-term care facility and the individual is otherwise eligible for medical assistance.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 431, § 1.

50-24.1-24.
Provider appeals — Definitions.

For purposes of this section:

“Denial of payment” means that the department has denied payment for a medical assistance claim or reduced the level of service payment for a service provided to an individual who was an eligible medical assistance recipient at the time the service was provided or the recoupment or adjustment of a claim, or part of a claim, following an audit or review.

“Provider” means an individual, entity, or facility that furnishes medical or remedial services or supplies pursuant to a provider agreement with the department or a third-party billing agency of the provider.

A provider may request a review of denial of payment under this section by filing a written request for review with the department within thirty days of the date of the department’s denial of payment. The written request for review must include the remittance advice or the notice of recoupment or adjustment and a statement of each disputed item with the reason or basis for the dispute. A provider may not request review under this section of the rate paid for a particular service or for a full or partial denial, recoupment, or adjustment of a claim due to required federal or state changes, payment system defects, or improper claims submission.

Within thirty days after requesting a review, a provider shall provide to the department all documents, written statements, exhibits, and other written information that support the provider’s request for review, together with a computation and the dollar amount that reflects the provider’s claim as to the correct computation and dollar amount for each disputed item.

The department shall assign to a provider’s request for review someone other than any individual who was involved in the initial denial of the claim. A provider who has requested review may contact the department for an informal conference regarding the review anytime before the department has issued its final decision.

The department shall make and issue a final decision within seventy-five days of receipt of the notice for review, if the department has denied payment for a medical assistance claim or reduced the level of service payment for a service. The department shall make and issue a decision within seventy-five days, or as soon thereafter as possible, of receipt of the notice of request for review, if the department has recouped or adjusted a claim, or part of a claim, following an audit. The department’s final decision must conform to the requirements of section 28-32-39. A provider may appeal the final decision of the department to the district court in the manner provided in section 28-32-42, and the district court shall review the department’s final decision in the manner provided in section 28-32-46. The judgment of the district court in an appeal from a request for review may be reviewed in the supreme court on appeal by any party in the same manner as provided in section 28-32-49.

Upon receipt of notice that the provider has appealed its final decision to the district court, the department shall make a record of all documents, written statements, exhibits, and other written information submitted by the provider or the department in connection with the request for review and the department’s final decision on review, which constitutes the entire record. Within thirty days after an appeal has been taken to district court as provided in this section, the department shall prepare and file in the office of the clerk of the district court in which the appeal is pending the original and a certified copy of the entire record, and that record must be treated as the record on appeal for purposes of section 28-32-44.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 425, § 2; 2019, ch. 408, § 28, effective July 1, 2019.

50-24.1-25.
Operating costs for developmental disabilities service providers. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 427, § 1; repealed by 2019, ch. 408, § 39, effective July 1, 2019.

50-24.1-26.
Medicaid waivers — In-home services.

The department shall administer Medicaid waivers to provide in-home services to children with extraordinary medical needs and to children up to the age of sixteen diagnosed with an autism spectrum disorder who would otherwise meet institutional level of care. The department may prioritize applicants for the waiver for children with extraordinary medical needs by degree of need.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 417, § 3; 2019, ch. 408, § 29, effective July 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 371, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

50-24.1-27.
Medical assistance program management. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 413, § 2; repealed by 2019, ch. 408, § 39, effective July 1, 2019.

50-24.1-28.
Medical assistance and Medicare prescription drug management program.

The department may not pay for:

A prescription drug that is within a class of drugs covered under the Medicare Prescription Drug, Improvement, and Modernization Act of 2003 [Pub. L. 108-173; 117 Stat. 2066; 42 U.S.C. 1396kk-1] and which is prescribed to a medical assistance recipient who is also a Medicare beneficiary.

A prescription drug that is not covered and for which no drug in its class is covered under the Medicare Prescription Drug, Improvement, and Modernization Act of 2003 [Pub. L. 108-173; 117 Stat. 2066; 42 U.S.C. 1396kk-1] and which is prescribed for an individual who is a medical assistance recipient and a Medicare beneficiary unless federal medical assistance matching funds are available at no less than the federal medical assistance percentage and the department determines that the drug is medically necessary for the individual.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 428, § 1; 2019, ch. 408, § 30, effective July 1, 2019.

50-24.1-28.1.
Pharmacy management program.

The department shall establish a pharmacy management program to be used by the medical assistance program for Medicaid expansion for prescription drug coverage. The department shall process claims through the department’s existing pharmacy claims system and Medicaid management information system and provide the contracted managed care plan with a daily pharmacy claims file for Medicaid expansion recipients.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 464, § 1, effective January 1, 2020.

50-24.1-29.
Insurers to provide certain information to the department. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

For purposes of this section:

“Department” means the department of human services or its agent.

“Health insurer” includes self-insured plans, group health plans as defined in section 607(1) of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 [29 U.S.C. 1167(1)], service benefit plans, managed care organizations, pharmacy benefit managers, or other parties that legally are responsible by statute, contract, or agreement for payment of a claim for a health care item or service.

As a condition of doing business in this state, health insurers shall provide to the department upon its request and in a manner prescribed by the department information about individuals who are eligible for medical assistance so the department may determine during what period the individual or the individual’s spouse or dependents may be or may have been covered by a health insurer and the nature of the coverage provided by the health insurer, including the name, address, and identifying number of the plan. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, every health insurer, not more frequently than twelve times in a year, shall provide to the department upon its request information, including automated data matches conducted under the direction of the department, as necessary, to:

Identify individuals covered under the insurer’s health benefit plans who are also recipients of medical assistance;

Determine the period during which the individual or the individual’s spouse or the individual’s dependents may be or may have been covered by the health benefit plan; and

Determine the nature of the coverage.

To facilitate the department in obtaining the information required by this section, a health insurer shall:

Cooperate with the department to determine whether a medical assistance recipient may be covered under the insurer’s health benefit plan and is eligible to receive benefits under the health benefit plan for services provided under the medical assistance program.

Respond to the request for information within ninety days after receipt of written proof of loss or claim for payment for health care services provided to a recipient of medical assistance who is covered by the insurer’s health benefit plan.

Accept the department’s right of recovery and the assignment to the department of any right of an individual or other entity to payment from a liable third party for an item or service for which payment has been made under the state medical assistance plan.

Respond to any inquiry by the department regarding a claim for payment for any health care item or service that is submitted no later than three years after the date of the provision of the health care item or service.

Agree not to deny a claim submitted by the department solely on the basis of the date of submission of the claim, the type of format of the claim form, or a failure to present proper documentation at the point of sale that is the basis of the claim if:

The claim is submitted by the department within the three-year period beginning on the date on which the item or service was furnished; and

Any action by the department to enforce its rights with respect to such claim is commenced within six years of the department’s submission of the claim.

A health insurer is prohibited, in enrolling an individual or on the individual’s behalf, from taking into account that the individual is eligible for or is provided medical assistance.

The department may not use or disclose any information provided by the insurer other than as permitted or required by law. The insurer may not be held liable for the release of insurance information to the department or a department agent if the release is authorized under this section.

The insurer must provide the information required in this subsection to the department at no cost if the information is in a readily available structure or format. If the department requests the information in a structure or format that is not readily available, the insurer may charge a reasonable fee for providing the information, not to exceed the actual cost of providing the information.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 426, § 1; 2019, ch. 408, § 31, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective Date.

This section became effective March 8, 2007, pursuant to an emergency clause in section 2 of chapter 426, S.L. 2007.

50-24.1-29.
Insurers to provide certain information to the department. [Effective September 1, 2022]

For purposes of this section:

“Department” means the department of health and human services or its agent.

“Health insurer” includes self-insured plans, group health plans as defined in section 607(1) of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 [29 U.S.C. 1167(1)], service benefit plans, managed care organizations, pharmacy benefit managers, or other parties that legally are responsible by statute, contract, or agreement for payment of a claim for a health care item or service.

As a condition of doing business in this state, health insurers shall provide to the department upon its request and in a manner prescribed by the department information about individuals who are eligible for medical assistance so the department may determine during what period the individual or the individual’s spouse or dependents may be or may have been covered by a health insurer and the nature of the coverage provided by the health insurer, including the name, address, and identifying number of the plan. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, every health insurer, not more frequently than twelve times in a year, shall provide to the department upon its request information, including automated data matches conducted under the direction of the department, as necessary, to:

Identify individuals covered under the insurer’s health benefit plans who are also recipients of medical assistance;

Determine the period during which the individual or the individual’s spouse or the individual’s dependents may be or may have been covered by the health benefit plan; and

Determine the nature of the coverage.

To facilitate the department in obtaining the information required by this section, a health insurer shall:

Cooperate with the department to determine whether a medical assistance recipient may be covered under the insurer’s health benefit plan and is eligible to receive benefits under the health benefit plan for services provided under the medical assistance program.

Respond to the request for information within ninety days after receipt of written proof of loss or claim for payment for health care services provided to a recipient of medical assistance who is covered by the insurer’s health benefit plan.

Accept the department’s right of recovery and the assignment to the department of any right of an individual or other entity to payment from a liable third party for an item or service for which payment has been made under the state medical assistance plan.

Respond to any inquiry by the department regarding a claim for payment for any health care item or service that is submitted no later than three years after the date of the provision of the health care item or service.

Agree not to deny a claim submitted by the department solely on the basis of the date of submission of the claim, the type of format of the claim form, or a failure to present proper documentation at the point of sale that is the basis of the claim if:

The claim is submitted by the department within the three-year period beginning on the date on which the item or service was furnished; and

Any action by the department to enforce its rights with respect to such claim is commenced within six years of the department’s submission of the claim.

A health insurer is prohibited, in enrolling an individual or on the individual’s behalf, from taking into account that the individual is eligible for or is provided medical assistance.

The department may not use or disclose any information provided by the insurer other than as permitted or required by law. The insurer may not be held liable for the release of insurance information to the department or a department agent if the release is authorized under this section.

The insurer must provide the information required in this subsection to the department at no cost if the information is in a readily available structure or format. If the department requests the information in a structure or format that is not readily available, the insurer may charge a reasonable fee for providing the information, not to exceed the actual cost of providing the information.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 426, § 1; 2019, ch. 408, § 31, effective July 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 352, § 450, effective September 1, 2022.

50-24.1-30.
Third-party liability recovery.

The department shall seek recovery of reimbursement from a third party up to the full amount of medical assistance paid.

A medical assistance recipient shall inform the department of any rights the recipient has to third-party benefits and shall inform the department of the name and address of any individual, entity, or program that is or may be liable to provide third-party benefits.

A release or satisfaction of a cause of action, suit, claim, counterclaim, demand, judgment, settlement, or settlement agreement is not valid or effectual as against a claim created under this chapter unless the department joins in the release or satisfaction or executes a release of its claim.

The department shall recover the full amount of all medical assistance provided on behalf of a recipient to the full extent of third-party benefits received by the recipient or the department for medical expenses. The department shall recover the third-party benefits directly from any third party or from the recipient or legal representative, if the recipient or legal representative has received third-party benefits, up to the amount of medical assistance provided to the recipient.

An applicant for or recipient of medical assistance shall cooperate in the recovery of third-party benefits.

To enforce its rights to third-party benefits, the department may institute, intervene in, or join any legal or administrative proceeding in its own name.

If either the recipient or the department brings an action against a third party, the recipient or the department must provide to the other within thirty days after commencing the action written notice by personal delivery or registered mail of the action, the name of the court in which the case is brought, the case number of such action, and a copy of the pleadings. If either the department or the recipient brings an action, the other may become a party to or may consolidate an action brought independently with the other.

A judgment, award, or settlement of a claim in an action by a recipient to recover damages for injuries or other third-party benefits in which the department has an interest may not be satisfied or released without first giving the department notice and a reasonable opportunity to file and satisfy its claim or proceed with any action as otherwise permitted by law.

Any transfer or encumbrance of any right, title, or interest to which the department has a right with the intent, likelihood, or practical effect of defeating, hindering, or reducing recovery by the department for reimbursement of medical assistance provided to a recipient is void and of no effect against the claim of the department.

A recipient who has notice or who has actual knowledge of the department’s rights to third-party benefits who receives any third-party benefit or proceeds for a covered illness or injury is either required to pay the department within sixty days after receipt of settlement proceeds the full amount of the third-party benefits up to the total medical assistance provided or to place a sum equal to the full amount of the total medical assistance provided in a trust account pending judicial or administrative determination of the department’s right to the third-party benefits.

Notwithstanding any provision in this section to the contrary, the department is not required to seek reimbursement from, or may reduce or compromise a claim against, a liable third party on claims for which the amount it reasonably expects to recover will be less than the cost of recovery or for which recovery efforts will not be cost-effective. Cost-effectiveness is determined based on the following:

Actual and legal issues of liability as may exist between the recipient and the liable party;

Total funds available for settlement; and

An estimate of the cost to the department of pursuing its claim.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 427, § 1; 2019, ch. 408, § 32, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 130, S.L. 2015 became effective July 1, 2015.

50-24.1-31.
Optional medical assistance for families of children with disabilities.

The department shall establish and implement a buyin program under the federal Family Opportunity Act enacted as part of the Deficit Reduction Act of 2005 [Pub. L. 109-171; 120 Stat. 4; 42 U.S.C. 1396] to provide medical assistance and other health coverage options to families of children with disabilities and whose net income does not exceed two hundred fifty percent of the federal poverty line published by the federal office of management and budget applicable to the household size.

The department may not require the payment of a premium or disenroll an individual for failure to pay a premium for families of children with disabilities coverage during a federally declared emergency if collection of the premium may impact the receipt of federal funds.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 428, § 1; 2019, ch. 37, § 6, effective August 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 408, § 33, effective July 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 12, § 31, effective May 10, 2021.

Effective Date.

This section became effective July 1, 2007.

Note.

Section 50-24.1-31 was amended 2 times by the 2019 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 33 of Chapter 408, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1115; and Section 6 of Chapter 37, Session Laws 2019, Senate Bill 2012.

50-24.1-32.
Medical assistance — Services provided by physician assistants and advanced practice registered nurses.

The medical assistance program must recognize physician assistants and advanced practice registered nurses with the roles of nurse practitioner or certified nurse midwife as primary care providers with the same rights and responsibilities given primary care physicians under the medical assistance program. Any care provided by the physician assistant or advanced practice registered nurse with the roles of nurse practitioner or certified nurse midwife as a primary care provider under the medical assistance program must be within the scope of the physician assistant’s or advanced practice registered nurse’s respective license.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 429, § 1; 2013, ch. 379, § 1; 2021, ch. 371, § 2, effective August 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 379, S.L. 2013 becomes effective on the date the director of the department of human services certifies to the secretary of state and the legislative council that the department has completed implementation of the medicaid management information system

This section became effective August 1, 2009.

50-24.1-33.
Brain injury — Home and community-based services — Quality control.

As part of the personal care services program for eligible medical assistance recipients and as part of the department’s services for eligible disabled and elderly individuals, the department shall provide home and community-based services to individuals who have a brain injury and meet the functional eligibility criteria for receipt of services.

The department shall conduct quality control activities and make training available to case managers and other persons providing services to individuals under this section.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 418, § 7; 2015, ch. 334, § 9, effective August 1, 2015; 2019, ch. 408, § 34, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 9 of chapter 334, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

This section became effective July 1, 2009.

50-24.1-34.
Processing of claims submitted on behalf of inmates. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

The department of human services shall process claims submitted by enrolled medical providers on behalf of inmates at county jails. Each county shall pay the department for the paid amount for the claims processed and also a processing fee for each claim submission. The department may establish a processing fee that may not exceed fifty dollars and shall update the fee annually on July first. The processing fee must be based on the actual costs to the department of the claims processing operations divided by the annual volume of claims submitted. The department shall invoice each county for payment of the processing fee.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 91, § 5; 2019, ch. 408, § 35, effective July 1, 2019.

50-24.1-34.
Processing of claims submitted on behalf of inmates. [Effective September 1, 2022]

The department of health and human services shall process claims submitted by enrolled medical providers on behalf of inmates at county jails. Each county shall pay the department for the paid amount for the claims processed and also a processing fee for each claim submission. The department may establish a processing fee that may not exceed fifty dollars and shall update the fee annually on July first. The processing fee must be based on the actual costs to the department of the claims processing operations divided by the annual volume of claims submitted. The department shall invoice each county for payment of the processing fee.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 91, § 5; 2019, ch. 408, § 35, effective July 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 352, § 451, effective September 1, 2022.

50-24.1-35.
Department to expand Medicaid coverage.

The department shall ensure Medicaid coverage includes Medicaid-covered services provided to an inmate of the department of corrections and rehabilitation or a county jail who would be eligible for Medicaid if the inmate were not incarcerated and who is admitted to an inpatient setting.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 91, § 5; 2019, ch. 408, § 36, effective July 1, 2019.

Note.

Section 8 of chapter 91, S.L. 2011 provides: “EFFECTIVE DATE. Section 5 of this Act (§§ 50-24.1-34 and 50-24.1-35) becomes effective upon the completion of the necessary changes to the department of human services’ medicaid claims processing and eligibility systems.”

50-24.1-36.
Civil sanction — Costs recoverable — Interest — Appeals.

For purposes of this section:

“Affiliate” means a person having an overt or covert relationship each with another person in a manner that one person directly or indirectly controls or has the power to control another.

“Provider” means any individual or entity furnishing Medicaid services under a provider agreement with the department.

A provider, an affiliate of a provider, or any combination of provider and affiliates, is liable to the department for up to twenty-five percent of the amount the department was induced to pay as a result of each act of fraud or abuse. This sanction is in addition to the applicable rules established by the department.

A provider, an affiliate of a provider, or any combination of provider and affiliates, is liable to the department for up to five thousand dollars on each act of fraud or abuse which did not induce the department to make an erroneous payment. This sanction is in addition to the applicable rules established by the department.

A provider, an affiliate of a provider, or any combination of provider and affiliates, that is assessed a civil sanction by the department also shall reimburse the department investigation fees, costs, and expenses for any investigation and action brought under this section.

Unless otherwise provided in a judgment entered against a provider or against an affiliate of the provider, overpayments and sanctions accrue interest at the legal rate beginning thirty days after the department provides written notice to the provider or the affiliate of the provider.

A provider or an affiliate of a provider who is assessed a sanction may request a review of the sanction by filing within thirty days of the date of the department’s notice of sanction a written notice with the department which includes a statement of each disputed item and the reason or basis for the dispute.

A provider or an affiliate of a provider may not request review under this section if the sanction imposed is termination or suspension and the notice of sanction states that the basis for the sanction is either:

The provider’s or affiliate’s failure to meet standards of licensure, certification, or registration where those standards are imposed by state or federal law as a condition to participation in the Medicaid program; or

The provider or affiliate has been similarly sanctioned by the Medicare program or by another state’s Medicaid program.

Within thirty days after requesting a review, a provider or affiliate shall provide to the department all documents, written statements, exhibits, and other written information that supports the request for review.

The department shall assign a provider’s or affiliate’s request for review to someone other than an individual who was involved in imposing the sanction. A provider or affiliate who has requested review may contact the department for an informal conference regarding the review any time before the department has issued its final decision.

The department shall make and issue its final decision within seventy-five days of receipt of the notice of request for review. The department’s final decision must conform to the requirements of section 28-32-39. A provider or affiliate may appeal the final decision of the department to the district court in the manner provided in section 28-32-42, and the district court shall review the department’s final decision in the manner provided in section 28-32-46. The judgment of the district court in an appeal from a request for review may be reviewed in the supreme court on appeal by any party in the same manner as provided in section 28-32-49.

Upon receipt of notice that the provider or affiliate has appealed its final decision to the district court, the department shall make a record of all documents, written statements, exhibits, and other written information submitted by the provider, affiliate, or the department in connection with the request for review and the department’s final decision on review, which constitutes the entire record. Within thirty days after an appeal has been taken to district court as provided in this section, the department shall prepare and file in the office of the clerk of the district court in which the appeal is pending the original and a certified copy of the entire record, and that record must be treated as the record on appeal for purposes of section 28-32-44.

Determinations of medical necessity may not lead to imposition of remedies, duties, prohibitions, and sanctions under this section.

The remedies, duties, prohibitions, and sanctions of this section are not exclusive and are in addition to all other causes of action, remedies, penalties, and sanctions otherwise provided by law or by provider agreement.

The state’s share of all civil sanctions, investigation fees, costs, expenses, and interest received by the department under this section must be deposited into the general fund.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 380, § 1; 2019, ch. 408, § 37, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective Date.

This section became effective August 1, 2013.

50-24.1-37.
Medicaid expansion — Legislative management report. [Effective January 1, 2022; Contingent repeal — See note]

The department of human services shall expand medical assistance coverage as authorized by the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act [Pub. L. 111-148], as amended by the Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 [Pub. L. 111-152] to individuals under sixty-five years of age with income below one hundred thirty-eight percent of the federal poverty line published by the federal office of management and budget applicable to the household size.

The department shall inform new enrollees in the medical assistance expansion program that benefits may be reduced or eliminated if federal participation decreases or is eliminated.

Except for pharmacy services and coverages for individuals ages nineteen and twenty, the department shall implement the expansion by bidding through private carriers or utilizing the health insurance exchange.

The contract between the department and the private carrier must provide the department with full access to provider reimbursement rates. The department shall consider provider reimbursement rate information in selecting a private carrier under this section. Before August first of each even-numbered year, the department shall submit a report to the legislative management regarding provider reimbursement rates under the medical assistance expansion program.

Provider reimbursement rate information received by the department under this section is an open record.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 381, §
1; 2015, ch. 341, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 11, § 38, effective July 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 37, § 7, effective July 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 37, § 8, effective January 1, 2020; 2021, ch. 12, § 32, effective July 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 12, § 33, effective January 1, 2022.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 341, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

This section becomes effective on January 1, 2014.

Note.

Section 50-24.1-37 was amended 2 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1 , the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 32 of Chapter 12, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1012; and Section 33 of Chapter 12, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1012.

Section 41 of chapter 11, S.L. 2017, provides,

“CONTINGENT EFFECTIVE DATE.

Section 40 of this Act becomes effective if the executive director of the department of human services certifies to the secretary of state and the legislative council the federal government ended the medical assistance expansion program.”

50-24.1-38.
Health-related services — Licensed emergency medical services personnel. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

Medical assistance must cover services provided by community emergency medical services personnel, and other similarly licensed personnel who are licensed or certified under section 23-27-04.3, if the services are provided to an eligible recipient as defined by rule. Community emergency medical services personnel services may include health assessment, chronic disease monitoring and education, immunizations and vaccinations, laboratory specimen collection, followup care, comprehensive health and safety assessment, wound management, assess and report compliance with established care plan, medication management, and other interventions within the scope of practice for each licensure level as approved by a supervising physician, physician assistant, or advanced practice registered nurse.

The department of human services shall adopt rules governing payments to licensed community emergency medical services personnel, advanced emergency medical technicians, and emergency medical technicians for health-related services provided to recipients of medical assistance, subject to necessary limitations and exclusions. A physician, a physician assistant, or an advanced practice registered nurse must supervise any care provided by a licensed community emergency medical services personnel, an advanced emergency medical technician, or an emergency medical technician.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 342, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2021, ch. 207, § 5, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 352, § 453, effective September 1, 2022.

Effective Date.

This section became effective August 1, 2015.

Note.

Section 50-24.1-38 was amended 2 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 5 of Chapter 207, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2133; and Section 453 of Chapter 352, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1247.